Arkansas, session 2025, HB1268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(28), concerning the definition of
"nonstate employees" applicable to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(28) “Nonstate employees” means county employees, municipal
employees, rural waterworks facilities board employees, regional airport
authority employees, border municipal airport employees, public facilities
board employees, regional solid waste management board employees, joint
county and municipal sanitation authority employees, employees of a public
transit authority, regional water distribution board employees, the employees
of economic development districts recognized as planning and development
districts under § 14-166-202, school employees, public water authority
employees, and the employees of the Intergovernmental Juvenile Detention
Council;
*LJH035*
03-19-2025 14:26:26 LJH035

As Engrossed: S3/19/25 HB1268

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101(30)(A), concerning the definition
of "participating public employer" applicable to the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(A) Any county, municipality, rural waterworks facilities
board, regional airport authority, border municipal airport authority, public
facilities board, regional solid waste management board, joint county and
municipal sanitation authority, a public transit authority, suburban
improvement district under § 14-92-502, public water authority, or regional
water distribution board in the state whose employees are included in the
membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-4-101, concerning definitions applicable
to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(48) "Public transit authority" means a public governmental
entity formed under the Public Transit System Act, § 14-334-101 et seq., that
has elected to participate as a public employer in the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System by a majority vote of the public transit
authority's board of directors.

/s/Unger














03-19-2025 14:26:26 LJH035